pt-PT: Estilo de bridão: Anatómica; Sem embocadura; Bosal; Dupla/Weymouth; Ensino; Atrelagem; Resistência; Elevadora; Hackamore; Cabeçada de quadra; Caça; Apresentação/mão; Salto; Sem focinheira; Corrida; Corda; Sidepull; Bridão; Treino; Cabeçada western; Outra
ko: 굴레 스타일: 해부학적; 비트리스; 보살; 더블/웨이머스; 마장마술; 마차용; 엔듀런스; 개그; 해카모어; 홀터 굴레; 헌터; 인핸드/쇼; 점핑; 노즈밴드리스; 레이싱; 로프; 사이드풀; 스내플; 훈련용; 웨스턴 헤드스톨; 기타
th: รูปแบบบังเหียน: ตามหลักสรีระ; ไม่มีเหล็กขัดฟัน; โบนซัล; Double/Weymouth; เดรสสาจ; แบบลากรถ; เอ็นดูแรนซ์; แก๊ก; แฮกคามอร์; ขุมม้าพร้อมสายบังเหียน; ฮันเตอร์; จูง/ประกวด; ข้ามสิ่งกีดขวาง; ไม่มีสายคาดจมูก; แข่งความเร็ว; เชือก; ไซด์พูล; สแนฟเฟิล; ฝึกซ้อม; ขุมม้าสไตล์เวสเทิร์น; อื่นๆ
el: Στυλ χαλιναριού: Ανατομικό; Χωρίς στόμιο; Μπόσαλ; Διπλό/Weymouth; Ιππικής δεξιοτεχνίας (Dressage); Αμαξοδήγησης; Αντοχής; Gag; Χάκαμορ; Χαλινός-καπίστρι; Κυνηγιού; Παρουσίασης/επίδειξης; Άλματος; Χωρίς επιρρίνιο; Ιπποδρομιών; Από σχοινί; Πλάγιας έλξης (Sidepull); Φιλέ; Εκπαίδευσης; Western; Άλλο
lt-LT: Kamanų tipas: Anatominis; Bežąslis; Bosalas; Dvigubas / Veimuto; Išjodinėjimo; Važiavimo kinkiniais; Ištvermės jojimo; Gag tipo; Hakamoras; Apynasrio tipo kamanos; Medžioklinis; Parodoms; Konkūrinis; Be snukio dirželio; Lenktyninis; Virvinis; Su traukimu iš šono (Sidepull); Paprastas; Treniruočių; Vesternietiško tipo kamanos; Kita
nl: Hoofdstel stijl: Anatomisch; Bitloos; Bosal; Stang en trens/Weymouth; Dressuur; Menhoofdstel; Endurance; Gag; Hackamore; Halsterhoofdstel; Hunter; Voorbreng/show; Springen; Zonder neusriem; Race; Touw; Sidepull; Trens; Training; Westernhoofdstel; Overig
bg-BG: Стил на юзда: Анатомична; Без трензела; Бозал; Двойна/уеймут; Дресажна; За впряг; За издръжливост; Гаг; Хакамор; Оглавник; Хънтър; За водене/шоу; За прескачане на препятствия; Без наносник; Състезателна; Въжена; Сайпул; Обикновена; Тренировъчна; Уестърн; Друго
hr-HR: Stil uzde: Anatomska; Bez žvale; Bosal; Dvostruka / Weymouth; Dresurna; Za zapregu; Za daljinsko jahanje; Gag; Hackamore; Oglavina-ular; Lovačka; Za revije / izlaganje u ruci; Za preponsko jahanje; Bez nosnog remena; Trkaća; Užnata; Sidepull; Obična uzda; Za trening; Zapadnjačka oglavina; Ostalo
hu: Kantár stílusa: Anatómiai; Zabla nélküli; Bosal; Nagykantár/Weymouth; Díjlovagló; Fogathajtó; Távlovagló; Felrántós; Hackamore; Kötőfékkantár; Hunter; Kézen vezetett/bemutató; Ugró; Orrszíj nélküli; Verseny; Kötél; Sidepull; Csikókantár; Kiképző; Western kantár; Egyéb
ja: ブライドルスタイル: アナトミック; ハミなし (ビットレス); ボサル; ダブル/ウェイマス; 馬場馬術用; 馬車用; エンデュランス用; ギャグ; ハックモア; 無口頭絡 (ホルターブライドル); ハンター; 引き馬用/ショー用; 障害飛越用; 鼻革なし; 競走用; ロープ; サイドプル; スナッフル; 調教用; ウェスタンヘッドストール; その他
zh-CN: 马笼头样式: 解剖学设计马缰; 无衔铁马缰; 玻萨尔无衔马缰; 双衔/韦茅斯马缰; 盛装舞步马缰; 驾车马缰; 耐力马缰; 提口衔马缰; 无衔马笼头; 笼头马缰; 猎马马缰; 牵引/展示马缰; 场地障碍马缰; 无鼻革马缰; 赛马马缰; 绳制马缰; 侧拉无衔马缰; 单衔马缰; 训练马缰; 西部马头络; 其他
sv: Tränsstil: Anatomisk; Bettlös; Bosal; Kandar/Weymouth; Dressyr; Körning; Distansryttning; Gag; Hackamore; Grimma/träns; Hunter; För hand/utställning; Hoppning; Utan nosgrimma; Galopp; Rep; Sidepull; Träns; Träning; Westernhuvudlag; Övrigt
fr: Style de bridon: Anatomique; Sans mors; Bosal; Double/Weymouth; Dressage; Attelage; Endurance; Releveur; Hackamore; Bridon-licol; Hunter; En main/présentation; Saut d’obstacles; Sans muserolle; Course; Corde; Sidepull; Bridon simple; Entraînement; Bridon western; Autre
da: Seletøjsstil: Anatomisk; Bidløs; Bosal; Kandar; Dressur; Kørsel; Distance; Gag; Hackamore; Grimetrense; Hunter; Mønstring/show; Spring; Uden næsebånd; Væddeløb; Reb; Sidepull; Trense; Træning; Western-hovedtøj; Andet
cs: Model uzdy: Anatomická; Bezudidlová; Bosal; Plná uzda (Weymouth); Drezurní; Vozatajská; Vytrvalostní; Gag; Hackamore; Uzdečka s ohlávkou; Lovecká; Výstavní; Skoková; Bez nánosníku; Dostihová; Provazová; Sidepull; Stihlová uzdečka; Tréninková; Westernová; Jiné
es: Estilo de la brida: Anatómica; Sin bocado; Bosal; Doble/Weymouth; Doma clásica; Enganche; Resistencia; Elevador; Hackamore; Brida de cabestro; Caza; De mano/exhibición; Salto; Sin muserola; Carreras; Cuerda; Sidepull; Filete; Entrenamiento; Cabezada western; Otra
zh-TW: 馬勒樣式: 解剖學設計; 無銜鐵; 波薩爾 (Bosal); 雙韁/威茅斯 (Weymouth); 馬場馬術; 駕車; 耐力賽; 提韁; 無銜頭套; 籠頭韁繩; 獵馬; 手牽/展示; 障礙超越; 無鼻帶; 賽馬; 繩索; 側拉韁繩; 小銜; 訓練; 西部頭套; 其他
it: stile di briglia: Anatomica; Senza imboccatura; Bosal; Doppia/Weymouth; Dressage; Attacchi; Endurance; Gag; Hackamore; Testiera cavezza; Hunter; Da presentazione/show; Salto ostacoli; Senza capezzina; Corsa; Corda; Sidepull; Filetto; Addestramento; Testiera western; Altro
en: Bridle style: Anatomic; Bitless; Bosal; Double/Weymouth; Dressage; Driving; Endurance; Gag; Hackamore; Halter bridle; Hunter; In-hand/show; Jumping; Nosebandless; Racing; Rope; Sidepull; Snaffle; Training; Western headstall; Other
fi: Suitsien tyyli: Anatoominen; Kuolaimeton; Bosal; Kanki/Weymouth; Kouluratsastus; Ajo; Matkaratsastus; Gag; Hackamore; Riimusuitset; Metsästys; Näyttely; Esteratsastus; Ilman turpahihnaa; Kilparatsastus; Köysi; Sidepull; Nivel; Harjoittelu; Lännensuitset; Muu
de: Zaumzeugstil: Anatomisch; Gebisslos; Bosal; Kandare/Weymouth; Dressur; Fahren; Distanzreiten; Aufziehtrense; Hackamore; Wanderreithalfter; Hunter; An der Hand/Show; Springen; Ohne Nasenriemen; Rennsport; Seil; Sidepull; Trense; Training; Western-Kopfstück; Sonstiges
sk-SK: Štýl uzdy: Anatomická; Bezzubadlová; Bosal; Drezúrna plná / Weymouth; Drezúrna; Vozatajská; Vytrvalostná; Gag; Hackamore; Ohlávková uzdečka; Hunter; Predvádzacia/výstavná; Skoková; Bez nánosníka; Dostihová; Povrazová; Sidepull; Stihlová; Tréningová; Westernová uzdečka; Iné
sl-SI: Slog uzde: Anatomsko; Brezžvalno; Bosal; Dvojno/Weymouth; Dresura; Vožnja; Vzdržljivost; Gag; Hackamore; Kombinirana uzda/hlevska oglavka; Hunter; Razstavno; Skakanje; Brez nosnika; Dirkanje; Vrv; Sidepull; Navadna uzda; Trening; Western uzda; Drugo
vi: Kiểu dây cương: Giải phẫu; Không hàm thiếc; Bosal; Cương kép/Weymouth; Biểu diễn; Kéo xe; Sức bền; Cương Gag; Hackamore; Dây dắt kèm dây cương; Săn bắn; Dắt tay/trình diễn; Nhảy vượt rào; Không dây đai mũi; Đua; Dây thừng; Cương kéo ngang; Snaffle; Huấn luyện; Cương kiểu phương Tây; Khác
tr: Dizgin stili: Anatomik; Gemsiz; Bosal; Çift/Weymouth; Dresaj; Sürüş; Dayanıklılık; Gag; Hackamore; Yular başlık; Engel atlama; Elde/gösteri; Engel atlama; Burunluksuz; Yarış; İp; Yandan çekmeli; Kırma gem; Eğitim; Western başlık; Diğer
pl: Styl uzdy: Anatomiczne; Bez wędzidła; Bosal; Munsztukowe; Ujeżdżeniowe; Zaprzęgowe; Rajdowe; Gag; Hackamore; Kantarogłowie; Myśliwskie; Pokazowe / do prowadzania w ręku; Skokowe; Bez nachrapnika; Wyścigowe; Sznurkowe; Sidepull; Wędzidłowe; Treningowe; Ogłowie westernowe; Inne
pt-BR: Estilo de rédea: Anatômica; Sem embocadura; Bozal; Duplo/Weymouth; Adestramento; Atrelagem; Enduro; Elevador; Hackamore; Cabeçada de cabresto; Hunter; De mão/apresentação; Salto; Sem focinheira; Corrida; Corda; Sidepull; Bridão; Treinamento; Cabeçada Western; Outros
ru: Стиль уздечки: Анатомическая; Сайдпул (без железа); Босал; Мундштучное оголовье; Выездковая; Упряжная; Для пробегов; Гэг; Хакамора; Уздечка-недоуздок; Охотничья; Выводная/выставочная; Конкурная; Без капсюля; Скаковая; Веревочная; Сайдпул; Трензельная; Тренировочная; Оголовье вестерн; Другая
ro-RO: Stilul căpăstrului: Anatomic; Fără zăbală; Bosal; Dublu/Weymouth; Dresaj; Atelaj; Anduranță; Gag; Hackamore; Căpăstru de tip halter; Vânătoare; Prezentare/Expoziție; Sărituri; Fără botar; Curse; Sfoară; Tragere laterală; Snaffle; Antrenament; Căpăstru Western; Altele
nb: Hodelagstil: Anatomisk; Bittløst; Bosal; Kandar/Weymouth; Dressur; Kjøring; Distanse; Gag; Hackamore; Grimehodelag; Hunter; Utstilling/show; Sprang; Uten nesebånd; Veddeløp; Tau; Sidepull; Trinse; Trening; Westernhodelag; Annet